Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.235

Election laws for county auditors.

The secretary of state shall ensure that each county auditor is provided with the most recent version of the election laws of the state, as contained in this title. Where amendments have been enacted after the last compilation of the election laws, he or she shall ensure that each county auditor receives a copy of those amendments before the next primary or election.

[ 2011 c 10 s 8; 2003 c 111 s 138; 1965 c 9 s 29.04.060. Prior: (i) 1907 c 209 s 16; RRS s 5193. (ii) 1889 p 413 s 34; RRS s 5299. Formerly RCW 29.04.060.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.